Arkansas, session 2025, HB1071.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 4-75-1103(3), concerning the definition of
"likeness" under the Frank Broyles Publicity Rights Protection Act of 2016,
is amended to read as follows:
(3) “Likeness” means a reproduction of the image of an individual
by any means other than a photograph, including without limitation generation
through means of artificial intelligence;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 4-75-1103(5), concerning the definition of
"photograph" under the Frank Broyles Publicity Rights Protection Act of 2016,
is amended to read as follows:
(5) “Photograph” means a reproduction of the image of an
*LJH013*
02-11-2025 10:43:41 LJH013

As Engrossed: S2/11/25 HB1071
individual that readily identifies the individual, whether made by:
photography, videotape, live transmission, or other means
(A) Photography;
(B) Videotape;
(C) Live transmission;
(D) Image, video, or three-dimensional generation through
means of artificial intelligence; or
(E) Other means; and

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 4-75-1103, concerning definitions under the
Frank Broyles Publicity Rights Protection Act of 2016, is amended to add an
additional subdivision to read as follows:
(7) "Voice" means a sound in a medium that is readily
identifiable and attributable to a particular individual, regardless of
whether the sound contains the actual voice or a simulation of the voice of
the individual, including without limitation a simulation of the voice of the
individual that is generated through means of artificial intelligence.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 4-75-1110(a)(1)(F)(i), concerning exempt
use of an individual's photograph or likeness by a service provider of a
system or network under the Frank Broyles Publicity Rights Protection Act of
2016, is amended to read as follows:
(i) Does not have actual knowledge that a photograph, voice, or
likeness on the system or network is in violation of this subchapter; or

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 4-75-1112 is amended to read as follows:
4-75-1112. Construction.
(a) This subchapter:
(1) Shall be liberally construed to accomplish its intent
and purposes; and
(2) Does not render invalid or unenforceable a contract
or license entered into before or after August 22, 2016, by an individual
during his or her lifetime by which the individual transferred, assigned, or
licensed all or part of the right to use his or her name, voice, signature,
photograph, or likeness.
(b) The property rights granted by this subchapter are not
02-11-2025 10:43:41 LJH013

As Engrossed: S2/11/25 HB1071
considered intellectual property for purposes of 47 U.S.C. § 230.

/s/R. Scott Richardson

































02-11-2025 10:43:41 LJH013